New Jersey, session 222, S4306.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 15 of  P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.61a) is amended to read as follows: 15.  a.  In addition to the property tax benefits paid under the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program to eligible homestead owners and tenants on their principal residences, whether owned or rented, pursuant to the provisions of sections 3 or 4 of P.L.1990, c.61 (C.54:4-8.59 or C.54:4-8.60) as amended, [the State Fiscal Year 2024] each annual appropriations act shall provide for the following additional benefits under the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program: (1) a resident homestead owner 65 years of age or older with gross income not in excess of $250,000 for the tax year that is used to determine such resident homestead owner's eligibility for the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program is eligible for an additional benefit in the amount of $250; provided, however, the total benefits received by such resident homestead owner under the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program and this section shall not exceed the amount of property taxes paid by such resident homestead owner; and (2) a resident 65 years of age or older whose homestead is a unit of residential rental property with gross income not in excess of $150,000 for the tax year that is used to determine such resident's eligibility for the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program is eligible for an additional benefit in the amount of $250. b.  The additional property tax benefits required pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be paid [in State Fiscal Years 2024, 2025, and 2026] annually at the same time and in the same manner as, and as part of the same application process for, property tax benefits provided under the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program. (cf:  P.L.2023, c.75, s.15) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.